Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2593.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2116.1. Prostate Health Public Education Campaign.--(a) The department shall conduct a prostate health public education campaign.(b) The department shall collect, maintain and provide to the general public up-to-date scientific information and other information on prostate health, including:(1) Risk factors that may be linked to increased risk of prostate cancer, including age, race or ethnicity and familial and genetic factors.(2) The periods at which discussions regarding screening for prostate cancer should occur for the following individuals:(i) Men who are at least fifty years of age and at average risk of developing prostate cancer.(ii) Men who are at least forty-five years of age and at high risk of developing prostate cancer.(iii) Men who are at least forty years of age and at the highest risk of developing prostate cancer.(3) Tests available to screen for prostate cancer, including prostate-specific antigen blood tests and digital rectal examinations.(4) The ability of prostate cancer to grow without any sign of symptoms . (5) The benefits and risks to prostate cancer screening tests.(6) The treatability of prostate cancer when detected early. (7) Any information the department deems necessary to assist in informing the general public about prostate health and prostate screening and testing.20260HB2593PN3502 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) The campaign shall include various methods for raising public awareness of the information listed under subsection (b), including, but not limited to:(1) An outreach campaign utilizing print, radio and television public service announcements, social media, advertisements, posters and other materials.(2) Community forums.(3) Distribution of information at public events.(4) Targeting of at-risk populations.(5) Provision of reliable information to policymakers.(6) Distribution of information through county and district health offices, city and county health departments, area agencies on aging, employer wellness programs, health care providers, insurers, including health maintenance organizations, and nonprofit and community organizations.(d) The campaign shall provide information in English, Spanish, Vietnamese, Mandarin Chinese and other languages deemed appropriate by the department.(e) The department shall update the resources utilized for the campaign as needed.(f) The Prostate Health Public Education Campaign Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury. All money deposited into the fund and interest and other earnings on the money in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to administer the campaign.(g) The department:(1) Shall use the money in the fund for the implementation and administration of the campaign.(2) May apply for grants to be deposited into the fund.(3) May accept donations to be deposited into the fund.20260HB2593PN3502 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Campaign." The prostate health public education campaign established under subsection (a)."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Prostate Health Public Education Campaign Fund established under subsection (f).Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20260HB2593PN3502 - 4 - 123456789